Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3407
Attorney in fact; withdrawal.

At any time when the principal is not incapable, the attorney in fact may withdraw by giving notice to the principal. At any time when the principal is incapable, the attorney in fact may withdraw by giving notice to the health care provider who shall cause the withdrawal to be made a part of the principal's medical records.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 21.